test/src/morphology/N-saarf_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - šaarf â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     šaarf+N+Sg+Nom: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Sg+Gen: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Sg+Acc: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Sg+Ill: šaa′rfe
     šaarf+N+Sg+Loc: šaarfâst
     šaarf+N+Sg+Com: šaarfin
     šaarf+N+Ess: šaarfân
     šaarf+N+Par: šaarfâd
     šaarf+N+Sg+Abe: šaarftää
     šaarf+N+Pl+Nom: šaarf
     šaarf+N+Pl+Gen: šaarfi
     šaarf+N+Pl+Acc: šaarfid
     šaarf+N+Pl+Ill: šaarfid
     šaarf+N+Pl+Loc: šaarfin
     šaarf+N+Pl+Com: šaarfivui′m
     šaarf+N+Pl+Abe: šaarfitää
